Washington statutes.
RCW 18.85.275

Designated broker or managing broker—Authority and duties.

(1) The designated broker or managing broker shall supervise the conduct of brokers and managing brokers for compliance with this chapter, chapter 18.235 RCW, and RCW 18.86.030.

(2) Listings, transactions, management agreements, and other contracts relating to providing brokerage services are property of the real estate firm. Brokers shall timely deliver to their appointed managing broker all funds and records required to be held or maintained by the real estate firm. A managing broker is responsible for such funds and records only after they are received from the broker. A managing broker shall timely deliver to the designated broker all funds and records required to be held or maintained by the real estate firm. The designated broker is responsible for such funds and records only after they are received from the managing broker or broker.

(3) The designated broker may delegate by written agreement the duties of safe handling of client funds, maintenance of trust accounts, and transaction and trust account records, along with supervision of brokers, to a managing broker licensed to the firm. The designated broker shall maintain a record of the firm's managing brokers and delegations to managing brokers.

(4) The designated broker or the designated broker's delegate has the authority to amend, modify, bind, create, rescind, terminate, or release real estate brokerage service contracts on behalf of the real estate firm. The designated broker has the authority to accept new or transferred licensees to represent the real estate firm.

(5) A broker who supervises or exercises right of control over other brokers in the performance of real estate brokerage services must be licensed as a managing broker.

(6) During the first two years of a broker's licensure, a managing broker must provide a heightened level of supervision as provided by rule of the director.

[ 2008 c 23 s 21.]